Utah statutes.
53-7-218.   Portable fire extinguishers -- Sale or lease without approval
prohibited.
A portable fire extinguisher may not be sold or leased in the state unless it
is approved, labeled, or listed by a nationally recognized testing laboratory
approved by the division as qualified to test portable fire extinguishers.
